District of Columbia statutes.
28-4804.07

Insurance policies and similar contracts.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a trustee shall allocate to principal the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract in which the trust or its trustee is named as beneficiary, including a contract that insures the trust or its trustee against loss for damage to, destruction of, or loss of title to a trust asset. The trustee shall allocate dividends on an insurance policy to income if the premiums on the policy are paid from income, and to principal if the premiums are paid from principal.

(b)

A trustee shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures the trustee against loss of occupancy or other use by an income beneficiary, loss of income, or, subject to § 28-4804.03, loss of profits from a business.

(c)

This section does not apply to a contract to which § 28-4804.09 applies.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 502(c), 48 DCR 2087

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 407 of the Uniform Principal and Income Act (1997 Act).